Utah statutes.
17-53-219.   Auditor statement of county debt.

The legislative body of each county shall have prepared by the auditor under its direction prior to the annual meeting for levying taxes a statement showing the indebtedness of the county, funded and floating, stating the amount of each class and the rate of interest borne by such indebtedness or any part of it.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 133, 2000 General Session

